Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1432.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "abuse" in section 6102(a) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6102. Definitions.(a) General rule.--The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abuse." The occurrence of one or more of the following acts between family or household members, sexual or intimate partners or persons who share biological parenthood:(1) Attempting to cause or intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causing bodily injury, serious bodily injury, rape, involuntary deviate sexual intercourse, sexual assault, statutory sexual assault, aggravated indecent assault, 12345678910111213141516171819 indecent assault or incest with or without a deadly weapon.(2) Placing another in reasonable fear of imminent serious bodily injury.(3) The infliction of false imprisonment pursuant to 18 Pa.C.S. § 2903 (relating to false imprisonment).(4) Physically or sexually abusing minor children, including such terms as defined in Chapter 63 (relating to child protective services).(5) Knowingly engaging in a course of conduct or repeatedly committing acts toward another person, including following the person, without proper authority, under circumstances which place the person in reasonable fear of bodily injury or causes substantial emotional distress to the person. The definition of this paragraph applies only to proceedings commenced under this title and is inapplicable to any criminal prosecutions commenced under Title 18 (relating to crimes and offenses).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1432PN1668 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819